Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3182.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.14, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3a. new text end new text begin English learner microcredential. new text end new text begin The board may adopt rules establishing a voluntary administrative microcredential for English learner and emerging multilingual learner directors and coordinators. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.187, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Professional growth. (a) Applicants for license renewal for a Tier 3 or Tier 4 license under sections 122A.183 and 122A.184, respectively, who have been employed as a teacher during the renewal period of the expiring license, as a condition of license renewal, must present to their local continuing education and relicensure committee or other local relicensure committee evidence of work that demonstrates professional reflection and growth in best teaching practices, including among other things, cultural competence in accordance with section 120B.30, subdivision 8deleted text begin , and practices in meeting the varied needs of English learners, from young children to adults under section 124D.59, subdivisions 2 and 2adeleted text end . A teacher may satisfy the requirements of this paragraph by submitting the teacher's most recent summative evaluation or improvement plan under section 122A.40, subdivision 8, or 122A.41, subdivision 5. (b) The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must ensure that its teacher relicensing requirements include paragraph (a). new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for licenses renewed on or after the day that the rules adopted under section 3 become effective. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.187, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin English learners. new text end new text begin The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must adopt rules that require all licensed teachers renewing a Tier 1, Tier 2, Tier 3, or Tier 4 teaching license under sections 122A.181 to 122A.184, respectively, to include in their renewal requirements further preparation in best practices in meeting the varied needs of English learners, from young children to adults under section 124D.59, subdivisions 2 and 2a. The rules must: new text end new text begin (1) require at least five hours of professional development training in content and pedagogy associated with, at a minimum, the benefits of multilingualism and multiculturalism, every five years; new text end new text begin (2) establish qualifications for a person conducting the training; and new text end new text begin (3) require that the training include culturally validating pedagogy training. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.19, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Microcredentials. new text end new text begin (a) The board must adopt rules establishing best practices for teaching English learners in specific content areas. The board must adopt rules establishing a voluntary microcredential in communication arts and literature, math, science, and social studies for teachers holding a license in bilingual or bicultural education or English as a second language. To earn a microcredential, a teacher must demonstrate mastery of the best practices established in rule for teaching English learners in a specific content area. new text end new text begin (b) The board must adopt rules to establish a voluntary microcredential in bilingual or bicultural education or English as a second language for teachers holding a license in communication arts and literature, math, science, or social studies. To earn the microcredential, a teacher must demonstrate mastery of the best practices established in the rules developed pursuant to paragraph (a) for teaching English learners in the content area in which the teacher is licensed. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124D.65, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. School district EL revenue. (a) For deleted text begin fiscal year 2024 through fiscal year 2026,deleted text end new text begin purposes of this subdivision:new text end new text begin (1) the English learner basic revenue allowance equals $1,228 for fiscal year 2024 through fiscal year 2026, and $1,775 for fiscal year 2027 and later; and new text end new text begin (2) the English learner concentration allowance equals $436 for fiscal year 2024 through fiscal year 2026, and $630 for fiscal year 2027 and later. new text end new text begin (b)new text end A district's English learner programs revenue equals the sum of: (1) the product of (i) deleted text begin $1,228deleted text end new text begin the English learner basic revenue allowance for that yearnew text end , and (ii) the greater of 20 or the adjusted average daily membership of eligible English learners enrolled in the district during the current fiscal year; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (2) deleted text begin $436deleted text end new text begin the English learner concentration allowancenew text end times the English learner pupil units under section 126C.05, subdivision 17new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (3) the number of students with limited or interrupted formal education under section 124D.59, subdivision 2a, times 0.5 times the sum of the English learner basic revenue allowance for that year and the English learner concentration allowance for that yearnew text end . deleted text begin (b) For fiscal year 2027 and later, a district's English learner programs revenue equals the sum of: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) the product of (i) $1,775, and (ii) the greater of 20 or the adjusted average daily membership of eligible English learners enrolled in the district during the current fiscal year; and deleted text end deleted text begin (2) $630 times the English learner pupil units under section 126C.05, subdivision 17. deleted text end new text begin (c) Revenue under paragraph (b), clause (3), must be used only to support the unique need of students with limited or interrupted formal education. new text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end A pupil ceases to generate state English learner aid new text begin under this subdivision new text end in the school year following the school year in which the pupil attains the state cutoff score on a commissioner-provided assessment that measures the pupil's emerging academic English. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for revenue for fiscal year 2026 and later. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124D.65, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 9a. new text end new text begin English learner student to English learner staff ratio. new text end new text begin Each year, a district receiving revenue under this section must calculate the district's ratio of English learner students to English learner staff and report that information to the Department of Education in the form and manner specified by the department. A district with a ratio in excess of 35 English learner students to each one English learner staff person must develop a plan to increase the district's English learner staff in the following year and submit that plan to the Department of Education in a form and manner specified by the department. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 127A.47, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Alternative attendance programs. (a) The general education aid and special education aid for districts must be adjusted for each pupil attending a nonresident district under sections 123A.05 to 123A.08, 124D.03, 124D.08, and 124D.68. The adjustments must be made according to this subdivision. (b) For purposes of this subdivision, the "unreimbursed cost of providing special education and services" means the difference between: (1) the actual cost of providing special instruction and services, including special transportation and unreimbursed building lease and debt service costs for facilities used primarily for special education, for a pupil with a disability, as defined in section 125A.02, or a pupil, as defined in section 125A.51, who is enrolled in a program listed in this subdivision, minus (2) if the pupil receives special instruction and services outside the regular classroom for more than 60 percent of the school day, the amount of general education revenue, excluding local optional revenue, plus local optional aid and referendum equalization aid as defined in section 125A.11, subdivision 1, paragraph (d), attributable to that pupil for the portion of time the pupil receives special instruction and services outside of the regular classroom, excluding portions attributable to district and school administration, district support services, operations and maintenance, capital expenditures, and pupil transportation, minus (3) special education aid under section 125A.76, excluding cross subsidy reduction aid under section 125A.76, subdivision 2e, attributable to that pupil, that is received by the district providing special instruction and services. For purposes of this paragraph, general education revenue and referendum equalization aid attributable to a pupil must be calculated using the serving district's average general education revenue and referendum equalization aid per adjusted pupil unit. (c) deleted text begin For fiscal year 2020, special education aid paid to a resident district must be reduced by an amount equal to 85 percent of the unreimbursed cost of providing special education and services.deleted text end For fiscal year 2021 and later, special education aid paid to a resident district must be reduced by an amount equal to 80 percent of the unreimbursed cost of providing special education and services. (d) Notwithstanding paragraph (c), special education aid paid to a resident district must be reduced by an amount equal to 100 percent of the unreimbursed cost of special education and services provided to students at an intermediate district, cooperative, or charter school where the percent of students eligible for special education services is at least 70 percent of the charter school's total enrollment. (e) Notwithstanding paragraph (c), special education aid paid to a resident district must be reduced under paragraph (d) for students at a charter school receiving special education aid under section 124E.21, subdivision 3, calculated as if the charter school received special education aid under section 124E.21, subdivision 1. (f) Special education aid paid to the district or cooperative providing special instruction and services for the pupil, or to the fiscal agent district for a cooperative, must be increased by the amount of the reduction in the aid paid to the resident district under paragraphs (c) and (d). If the resident district's special education aid is insufficient to make the full adjustment under paragraphs (c), (d), and (e), the remaining adjustment shall be made to other state aids due to the district. (g) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), general education aid paid to the resident district of a nonspecial education student for whom an eligible special education charter school receives general education aid under section 124E.20, subdivision 1, paragraph (c), must be reduced by an amount equal to the difference between the general education aid attributable to the student under section 124E.20, subdivision 1, paragraph (c), and the general education aid that the student would have generated for the charter school under section 124E.20, subdivision 1, paragraph (a). For purposes of this paragraph, "nonspecial education student" means a student who does not meet the definition of pupil with a disability as defined in section 125A.02 or the definition of a pupil in section 125A.51. (h) An area learning center operated by a service cooperative, intermediate district, education district, or a joint powers cooperative may elect through the action of the constituent boards to charge the resident district tuition for pupils rather than to have the general education revenue paid to a fiscal agent school district. Except as provided in paragraph (f), the district of residence must pay tuition equal to at least 90 and no more than 100 percent of the district average general education revenue per pupil unit minus an amount equal to the product of the formula allowance according to section 126C.10, subdivision 2, times .0466, calculated without compensatory revenuedeleted text begin , local optional revenue,deleted text end and transportation sparsity revenue, times the number of pupil units for pupils attending the area learning center. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for revenue for fiscal year 2026 and later. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin APPROPRIATION; BOARD OF SCHOOL ADMINISTRATORS RULEMAKING.new text end new text begin $30,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the Board of School Administrators to support the rulemaking process under Minnesota Statutes, section 122A.14, subdivision 3a. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2026. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin APPROPRIATION; PROFESSIONAL EDUCATOR LICENSING AND STANDARDS BOARD RULEMAKING.new text end new text begin $100,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board to support the rulemaking process required under Minnesota Statutes, section 122A.19, subdivision 7. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2026. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin APPROPRIATION; ENGLISH LEARNER PROGRAMMING.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin English learner aid for students with limited or interrupted formal education. new text end new text begin For additional general education aid under Minnesota Statutes, section 126C.13, for English learner program aid: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin COMPASS and MTSS. new text end new text begin (a) To support the development and implementation of the Multitiered System of Support (MTSS) framework and the Collaborative Minnesota Partnerships to Advance Student Success (COMPASS) school improvement model: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 13,500,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 13,500,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) Of this amount, $5,000,000 each year is to support implementation of MTSS and COMPASS. Money must be used to support increased capacity at the Department of Education and the Minnesota Service Cooperatives for implementation supports. new text end new text begin (c) Of this amount, $5,000,000 each year is reserved for grants to school districts, charter schools, and cooperative units as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 123A.24, subdivision 2, for implementation of MTSS, including: new text end new text begin (1) hiring local MTSS coordinators; new text end new text begin (2) hiring multilingual specialists; new text end new text begin (3) deferring costs for personnel to participate in cohort activities and professional learning; and new text end new text begin (4) piloting a Department of Education One Plan, the consolidation of multiple reporting structures to streamline various applications, reports, and submissions by school districts and charter schools. new text end new text begin Up to five percent of this amount is available for program and grant administration. new text end new text begin (d) Of this amount, $3,000,000 each year must be used to develop a regional network focusing on mathematics to provide dedicated mathematics trainers and coaches to train regional support staff from the Minnesota Service Cooperatives to support school leaders and teachers in implementing evidence-based instructional strategies in mathematics. Money may also be used to host an annual Mathematics Standards-Based Instructional Institute. new text end new text begin (e) Of this amount, $500,000 each year is for the University of Minnesota Center for Applied Research and Educational Improvement to support implementation and evaluation of the MTSS framework. new text end new text begin (f) Support for school districts, charter schools, and cooperative units under this subdivision may include but is not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) partnering with the Minnesota Service Cooperatives to support districts in implementing COMPASS to support schools in the areas of literacy, math, social-emotional learning, and mental health using the MTSS framework; new text end new text begin (2) providing support to districts and charter schools identified under Minnesota Statutes, section 120B.11; new text end new text begin (3) providing support to districts and charter schools in streamlining various applications, reports, and submissions to the Department of Education through One Plan; new text end new text begin (4) providing training, guidance, and implementation resources for MTSS, including a universal screening process approved by the Department of Education to identify students who may be at risk of experiencing academic, behavioral, and social-emotional development difficulties; new text end new text begin (5) providing guidance to convene school-based teams to analyze data provided by screenings and resources for related identification, instruction, and intervention methods; new text end new text begin (6) dyslexia screening and intervention that are evidence-based; new text end new text begin (7) requiring school districts and charter schools to provide parents of students identified in screenings with notice of screening findings and related support information; new text end new text begin (8) requiring districts and charter schools to provide at-risk students with interventions and to monitor the effectiveness of these interventions and student progress; and new text end new text begin (9) developing and annually reporting findings regarding the implementation of MTSS. new text end new text begin (g) Any balance in the first year does not cancel but is available in the second year. new text end